Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 1. Generally

§ 19-8-101.
Organized and unorganized militia.

The militia of the state is divided into the organized militia and the unorganized militia.

The organized militia consists of the following:

Such elements of the land and air forces of the national guard of the United States as are allocated to the state by the president, the secretary of defense or the secretary of the army or the air force and accepted by the state, hereinafter to be known as the Wyoming national guard; and

Wyoming state guard forces, when organized.

The unorganized militia consists of all persons liable to serve in the militia but not commissioned or enlisted in the organized militia.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 72, § 4; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-103

; 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

§ 19-8-102.
Composition of state militia; age limits; physical and mental qualifications.

Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section the militia of the state includes all qualified residents of the state between the ages of seventeen (17) and seventy (70) years, and any nonresident applicants as may be enrolled or commissioned therein, and in the case of the organized militia, who are within the age limits and possess the physical and mental qualifications prescribed by law or regulations for the reserve components of the armed forces of the United States.

The following persons are exempt from militia service:

Persons exempt from military service by the laws of the United States;

Regular or duly ordained ministers of religion, or duly elected church officials regularly conducting church services or recognized by their church as devoting the major portion of their time to the practice of religion;

Students preparing for the ministry in recognized theological or divinity schools; and

Persons who, by reason of religious belief, have scruples of conscience adverse to bearing arms.

History.

W.S. 1957, § 19-78.2; Laws 1969, ch. 72, §§ 2, 3; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-102

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 1999, ch. 138, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Part-time religious activity as giving rise to minister of religion status entitling to exemption under § 6 (g) of the Universal Military Training and Service Act (50 U.S.C. § 456 (g) [ 50 U.S.C. Appx § 456(g)]), 1 ALR Fed 607.

Discharge from armed forces on ground of conscientious objection, 10 ALR Fed 15.

§ 19-8-103.
Pursuit of insurrectionists.

Any military forces of another state which are in fresh pursuit of insurrectionists, saboteurs or enemy groups may continue pursuit into this state until the military or police forces of this state have had reasonable opportunity to take up the pursuit and may arrest or capture such persons within this state while in fresh pursuit.

Members of the Wyoming militia, upon orders of the officer in immediate command thereof, may continue in fresh pursuit of insurrectionists, saboteurs or enemy groups beyond the borders of this state into another state until the military or police forces of the other state have had a reasonable opportunity to take up the pursuit of such persons if the other state has authorized the pursuit by the forces of this state. Persons who are captured in another state by members of forces of this state shall be surrendered to the military or police forces of the state in which they are taken without undue delay.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 49, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 19-3; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-1-102

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

§ 19-8-104.
Other organizations parading with arms prohibited; penalty.

No group or assembly of persons other than the regularly organized national guard or the troops of the United States shall associate themselves together as a military company or organization, or parade in public with arms without license of the governor. No city or town shall raise or appropriate monies for arming, equipping, uniforming or in any way supporting, sustaining or providing drill rooms or armories for such group or assembly of persons.

Any person violating subsection (a) of this section or who belongs to or parades with any unauthorized group or assembly of persons with arms shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), by imprisonment for a term not exceeding one (1) year, or both, for each offense.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 163, §§ 44, 45; R.S. 1931, §§ 73-145, 73-146; C.S. 1945, §§ 30-148, 30-149; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-36, 19-37; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-1-106

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state or local enactments regulating parades, 80 ALR5th 255.

§ 19-8-105.
Penalty for refusing to deliver military properties.

Any person who purchases, retains or possesses without right, any military properties belonging to the state or United States government and refuses to deliver the property to any officer entitled to take possession thereof is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisoned in the county jail not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 163, § 43; R.S. 1931, § 73-144; C.S. 1945, § 30-147; W.S. 1957, § 19-10; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-1-105

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.